Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 36. Titling of Vessels, Snowmobiles, and All-Terrain Vehicles
§ 3826.
Release of security interest.

Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle for which the certificate of title is in the possession of the lienholder, he or she shall, within 10 days after demand and, in any event, within 30 days, execute a release of his or her security interest, in the space provided on the certificate or as the Commissioner prescribes, and mail or deliver the certificate and release to the next lienholder named, or, if none, to the owner or any person who delivers to the lienholder an authorization from the owner to receive the certificate. The owner, other than a dealer holding the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle for resale, shall promptly cause the certificate and release to be mailed or delivered to the Commissioner, who shall release the lienholder’s rights on the certificate or issue a new certificate.

Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle for which the certificate of title is in the possession of a prior lienholder, the lienholder whose security interest is satisfied shall within 10 days after demand and, in any event, within 30 days execute a release in the form the Commissioner prescribes and deliver the release to the owner or any person who delivers to the lienholder an authorization from the owner to receive it. The lienholder in possession of the certificate of title shall either deliver the certificate to the owner, or the person authorized by him or her, for delivery to the Commissioner or, upon receipt of the release, mail or deliver it with the certificate to the Commissioner, who shall release the subordinate lienholder’s rights on the certificate or issue a new certificate.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2001, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 22.

§ 3827.
Lienholder to furnish information.

A lienholder named in a certificate of title shall, upon written request of the owner or of another lienholder named on the certificate, disclose any pertinent information as to his or her security agreement and the indebtedness secured by it.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3828.
Method of perfecting security interest exclusive.

The method provided in this chapter of perfecting and giving notice of security interests subject to this chapter is exclusive.
Security interests subject to this chapter are exempted from the provisions of law that otherwise require or relate to the filing of instruments creating or evidencing security interests.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3829.
Altering, forging, or counterfeiting certificates.

No person shall with fraudulent intent:

alter, forge, or counterfeit a certificate of title;

alter or forge an assignment of a certificate of title, or an assignment or release of a security interest, on a certificate of title or a form the Commissioner prescribes;

possess or use a certificate of title knowing it to have been altered, forged, or counterfeited; or

use a false or fictitious name or address, or make a material false statement, or fail to disclose a security interest, or conceal any other material fact, in an application for a certificate of title or a duplicate certificate of title.

A person convicted under this section shall be fined not less than $500.00 nor more than $5,000.00 or be imprisoned for not less than one year or for more than five years, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§ 3830.
Other offenses.

No person shall:

with fraudulent intent, permit another, not otherwise entitled, to use or have possession of a certificate of title;

willfully fail to mail or deliver a certificate of title or application to the Commissioner within 10 days after the time required by this chapter;

willfully fail to deliver to his or her transferee a certificate of title within 10 days after the time required by this chapter; or

willfully violate any provision of this chapter, except as provided in section 3829 of this title.

A person convicted under this section shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 252.

§ 3831.
Report of theft; recovery of unclaimed vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle.

An enforcement officer, sheriff, or constable who learns of the theft of a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle not since recovered, or of the recovery of a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle whose theft or conversion he or she knows or has reason to believe has been reported to the Commissioner, shall forthwith report the theft or recovery to the Commissioner.

An owner or a lienholder may report the theft of a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle, or its conversion if a crime, to the Commissioner, but the Commissioner may disregard the report of a conversion unless a warrant has been issued for the arrest of a person charged with the conversion. A person who has reported the theft or conversion of a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle shall, forthwith after learning of its recovery, report the recovery to the Commissioner.

An operator of a place of business for garaging, repairing, parking, or storing vessels, snowmobiles, or all-terrain vehicles for the public, in which a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle remains unclaimed for a period of 30 days, shall, within five days after the expiration of that period, report the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle as unclaimed, to the Commissioner. A vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle left by its owner whose name and address are known to the operator or his or her employee is not considered unclaimed. A person who fails to report a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle as unclaimed in accordance with this subsection forfeits all claims and liens for its garaging, parking, or storing and shall be fined not more than $25.00 for each day his or her failure to report continues.

The Commissioner shall maintain and appropriately index weekly, any cumulative public records of stolen, converted, recovered, and unclaimed vessels, snowmobiles, or all-terrain vehicles reported to him or her pursuant to this section. The Commissioner may make and distribute copies of the weekly records so maintained to enforcement officers upon request without fee and to others for the fee, if any, the Commissioner prescribes.

The Commissioner may suspend the registration of a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle whose theft or conversion is reported to him or her pursuant to this section. Until the Commissioner learns of its recovery or that the report of its theft or conversion was erroneous, he or she shall not issue a certificate of title for the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2001, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 3832.
False report.

A person who knowingly makes a false report of the theft or conversion of a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle to an enforcement officer or to the Commissioner shall be fined not more than $500.00 or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2001, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 3833.
Dismantling or destruction of vessels, snowmobiles, or all-terrain vehicles.

Except for vessels, snowmobiles, or all-terrain vehicles for which no certificate of title is required pursuant to section 3807 of this title, any person who purchases or in any manner acquires a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle as salvage who scraps, dismantles, or destroys a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle, or any insurance company or representative of an insurance company who declares a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle to be a total loss, shall make application for a salvage certificate of title within 15 days of the time the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle is purchased or otherwise acquired as salvage, scrapped, dismantled, or destroyed, or declared a total loss. The application shall be accompanied by:

any certificate of title; and

any other information or documents that the Commissioner may reasonably require to establish ownership of the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle and the existence or nonexistence of any security interest in the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle.

When a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle is destroyed by crushing for scrap, the person causing the destruction shall immediately mail or deliver to the Commissioner the certificate of title, if any, endorsed “crushed” and signed by the person, accompanied by the original plate showing the original identification number. The plate shall not be removed until such time as the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle is crushed.

This section shall not apply to, and salvage certificates shall not be required for, unrecovered stolen vessels, snowmobiles, or all-terrain vehicles or vessels, snowmobiles, or all-terrain vehicles stolen and recovered in an undamaged condition, provided that the original vessel, snowmobile, or all terrain vehicle identification number plate has not been removed, altered, or destroyed, and the number on the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle is identical with that on the original title certificate.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 39

, § 7.

§ 3834.
Issuance of salvage title.

The Commissioner shall file and maintain in the manner provided in section 3010 of this title each application received and when satisfied as to its genuineness and regularity and that the applicant is entitled to the issuance of a salvage certificate of title, shall issue a salvage certificate of title to the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 39

, § 8.

§ 3835.
Salvaged, totaled, and rebuilt vessels, snowmobiles, or all-terrain vehicles.

If a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle upon which a salvage certificate of title, a parts-only certificate, or other document indicating the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle is not sold for reregistration purposes has been or should have been issued by the Commissioner or by any other jurisdiction or person, or if a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle that has been declared totaled is rebuilt and restored for operation, the owner shall not apply for a certificate of title or registration, and none shall be issued, until the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle has been inspected by the Commissioner or his or her authorized representative. The inspection of the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Commissioner and shall include verification of the identification number and bills of sale or titles for major component parts used to rebuild the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle. When necessary, a new identification number shall be attached to the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle as provided by section 2003 of this title. Any new title issued for these vessels, snowmobiles, or all-terrain vehicles shall contain the legend “rebuilt.”

Any person who sells, trades, or offers for sale or trade to a prospective purchaser any interest in a salvaged, salvaged and rebuilt, or totaled vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle shall disclose the fact that the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle has been salvaged, salvaged and rebuilt, or totaled both orally and in writing before a sale, trade, or transfer is made. Written disclosure that the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle has been salvaged, salvaged and rebuilt, or totaled, in addition to being disclosed on the certificate of title as required by this subchapter, shall also be conspicuously disclosed on any bill of sale, transfer, purchase, or other agreement.

Failure of the seller to provide the notices required by this section shall result in the seller being required, at the option of the buyer, to refund to the buyer the purchase price, including taxes, license fees, and similar governmental charges.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 39

, § 9; amended

2015, No. 50

, § 22.

§ 3836.
Records; inspection.

Each person who purchases or in any manner acquires a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle as salvage shall keep and maintain for a period of not less than five years such records as may be prescribed by the Commissioner that are reasonably necessary to substantiate the information contained in the application required by sections 3833 and 3835 of this title. These records shall include parts and accessories obtained and used for the repair or rebuilding, or both, of a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle, and such financial records that will allow the Commissioner to determine if the person qualifies to become or remain licensed as a “salvage dealer.”

The Commissioner, or his or her agents, may inspect and examine the books, records, premises, and vehicles on the premises of any salvage dealer during the usual business hours of the day to verify the truth and accuracy of any information furnished in connection with the provisions of this section and section 3833 of this chapter.

Any salvage dealer who in any manner receives a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle that does not have a plate attached to the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle bearing the vehicle identification number shall notify the Commissioner in writing that such a vessel, snowmobile, or all terrain vehicle has been received within seven days.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 39

, § 10; amended

2021, No. 76

, § 32.

§ 3837.
Penalty.

A person who violates any provision of section 3836 of this chapter shall be fined not more than $500.00 or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.

A person who violates section 3833 or 3835 of this chapter shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 39

, § 11.